Hawaii statutes.
[§200-11] Existing permits. An owner
of a vessel used as a principal place of habitation holding a permit for that
use in a state small boat harbor on June 9, 1976, may continue to moor the
vessel in that harbor for such purpose and be permitted to obtain a new mooring
permit; provided that the owner conforms to conditions set forth in sections
200-9 and 200-10. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next